Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.010

County may acquire, construct, maintain, and operate ferry.

Any county may construct, condemn, or purchase, operate and maintain ferries or wharves at any unfordable stream, lake, estuary or bay within or bordering on said county, or between portions of the county, or between such county and other counties, together with all the necessary boats, grounds, roads, approaches, and landings appertaining thereto under the direction and control of the board of county commissioners free or for toll and as the board shall by resolution determine.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.54.010. Prior: 1919 c 115 s 1; 1899 c 29 s 1; 1895 c 130 s 2; RRS s 5477.]